California statutes. Financial Code
(i) If the commissioner makes an examination in connection with a pending application, the foreign (other nation) credit union making the application shall pay a fee for the examination, as determined by the commissioner. In determining the fee, the commissioner may use the estimated average hourly cost, including, but not limited to, overhead, for all persons performing the examination, plus, if in the opinion of the commissioner it is necessary for any examiner engaged in the examination to travel outside this state, the travel expenses of the examiner.

(j) If the commissioner makes an examination of a foreign (other nation) credit union that is licensed to maintain an office, the foreign (other nation) credit union shall pay a fee for the examination, as determined by the commissioner. In determining the fee, the commissioner may use the estimated average hourly cost, including, but not limited to, overhead, for all persons performing the examination, plus, if in the opinion of the commissioner it is necessary for any examiner engaged in the examination to travel outside this state, the travel expenses of the examiner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 20, Sec. 14.   (AB 137)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

16506.

(a) (1) No foreign (other nation) credit union shall be issued a license to maintain an office unless it shall have first filed with the commissioner, in the form that the commissioner may by regulation or order require, an appointment irrevocably appointing the commissioner and the commissioner’s successor from time to time in office to be the foreign (other nation) credit union’s attorney to receive service of any lawful process in any noncriminal judicial or administrative proceeding against the foreign (other
 nation) credit union or any of its successors that arises out of the activities in this state after the appointment has been filed, with the same force and validity as if served personally on the foreign (other nation) credit union or its successor, as the case may be.

(2) Any foreign (other nation) credit union that maintains an office in this state and that has not filed with the commissioner an appointment pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be deemed by the maintenance of that office to have appointed the commissioner as its attorney to receive service of any lawful process in any noncriminal judicial or administrative proceeding against the foreign (other nation) credit union or any of its successors that arises out of the activities in this state with the same force and validity as if served personally on the foreign (other nation) credit union or its successor, as the case may be.

(b) Service may be made on a foreign (other nation) credit union that has appointed or is deemed to have appointed the commissioner as its attorney for service of process by leaving a copy of the process at any office of the commissioner. However, the service is not effective unless (1) the party making the service, who may be the commissioner, forthwith sends notice of the service and a copy of the process by registered or certified mail to the foreign (other nation) credit union served at its last address on file with the commissioner at any of its offices in this state or at its head office, and (2) an affidavit of compliance with this subdivision by the party making service is filed in the case on or before the return date, if any, or within any further time that the court, in the case of a judicial proceeding, or the administrative agency, in the case of an administrative proceeding, allows.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 612, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

16507.

In administering the provisions of this chapter, the commissioner may share information with federal and home country regulators of foreign (other nation) credit unions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 612, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

16508.

No license shall be transferable or assignable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 612, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

16509.

A foreign (other nation) credit union that is licensed to establish an office shall post at a conspicuous place at the office a notice to the public which states the name of the foreign (other nation) credit union, the type of office it is, and the foreign country under whose laws it was organized or chartered.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 612, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

16510.

Whenever a foreign (other nation) credit union is licensed to establish more than one office, it shall designate one of its offices as its primary office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 612, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

16511.

Each foreign (other nation) credit union that is licensed to establish an office shall conduct all of the business of the office in a single building or in adjoining buildings. However, with the approval of the commissioner, the foreign (other nation) credit union may conduct part of the business of the office elsewhere in the same vicinity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 612, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

16512.

Whenever any provision of this chapter or of any regulation or order issued under this chapter that is applicable to or with respect to a foreign (other nation) credit union that maintains a branch office or facility is inconsistent with any provision of any other chapter of this division, the former provision applies, and the latter provision does not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 612, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Representative Offices [16525. - 16530.]

16525.

(a) No foreign (other nation) credit union shall establish or maintain an office in this state at which it engages in representational functions unless it is licensed to maintain a representative office, agency, or branch office at that place.

(b) (1) No person shall establish or maintain an office in this state as representative of a foreign (other nation) credit union unless the foreign (other nation) credit union is licensed to maintain the office as a
 representative office.

(2) For purposes of this chapter, if any person establishes or maintains an office in this state as representative of a foreign (other nation) credit union, the foreign (other nation) credit union shall be deemed to establish and maintain the office as a representative office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 612, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

16526.

(a) No foreign (other nation) credit union shall establish or maintain a representative office unless the commissioner shall have first approved the establishment of the office and issued a license authorizing the foreign (other nation) credit union to maintain the office.

(b) If the commissioner finds the following with respect to an application by a foreign (other nation) credit union for approval to establish a representative office, the commissioner shall approve the
 application:

(1) That the foreign (other nation) credit union, the directors and executive officers of the foreign (other nation) credit union, and the proposed management of the office are each of good character and sound financial standing.

(2) That the financial history and condition of the foreign (other nation) credit union are satisfactory.

(3) That the management of the foreign (other nation) credit union and the proposed management of the office are adequate.

(4) That it is reasonable to believe that, if licensed to maintain the office, the foreign (other nation) credit union will operate the office in compliance with all applicable laws, regulations, and orders.

If the commissioner finds otherwise, the
 commissioner shall deny the application.

(c) Whenever an application by a foreign (other nation) credit union for approval to establish a representative office has been approved and all conditions precedent to the issuance of a license authorizing the foreign (other nation) credit union to maintain the office have been fulfilled, the commissioner shall issue the license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 612, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

16527.

(a) No foreign (other nation) credit union that is licensed to maintain a representative office shall relocate the office unless the commissioner shall have first approved the relocation and issued a license authorizing the credit union to maintain the office at the new site.

(b) (1) In case the new site of a representative office is in the same vicinity as the old site, the commissioner shall approve an application by a foreign (other nation) credit union
 for approval to relocate the representative office if the commissioner finds that the relocation of the office will not be substantially detrimental to the public convenience and advantage.

(2) In case the new site of a representative office is not in the same vicinity as the old site, the commissioner shall approve an application by a foreign (other nation) credit union for approval to relocate the representative office if the commissioner finds both of the following:

(i) The relocation of the office from the old site will not be substantially detrimental to the public convenience and advantage in the area that is primarily served by the office at the old site.

(ii) The relocation of the office to the new site will promote the public convenience and advantage.

If the
 commissioner does not make the findings required under either paragraph (1) or (2), the commissioner shall deny the application.

(c) Whenever an application by a foreign (other nation) credit union for approval to relocate a representative office has been approved and all conditions precedent to the issuance of a license authorizing the foreign (other nation) credit union to maintain the office at the new site have been fulfilled, the commissioner shall issue the license.

(d) Promptly after a foreign (other nation) credit union that is licensed to maintain a representative office relocates the office, the foreign (other nation) credit union shall surrender to the commissioner the license that authorized it to maintain the office at the old site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 612, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

16528.

A foreign (other nation) credit union that is licensed to maintain a representative office may, subject to any regulations that the commissioner may prescribe, engage in representational functions at the office but shall not solicit or accept share accounts or deposits or otherwise transact business at the office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 612, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

16529.

(a) (1) No foreign (other nation) credit union that is licensed to maintain a representative office shall close the office unless the commissioner shall have first approved the closing.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall not be deemed to prohibit a foreign (other nation) credit union that is licensed to maintain a representative office from closing the office in accordance with Article 8 (commencing with Section 16800).

(b) If the commissioner finds, with respect to an application by a foreign (other nation) credit union for approval to close a representative office, that the closing of the office will not be substantially detrimental to the public convenience and advantage, the commissioner shall approve the application. If the commissioner finds otherwise, the commissioner shall deny the application.

(c) Whenever an application by a foreign (other nation) credit union for approval to close a representative office has been approved and all conditions precedent to the closing have been fulfilled, the foreign (other nation) credit union may close the office and shall promptly thereafter surrender to the commissioner the license that authorized it to maintain the office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 612, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

16530.

The approval of an application for approval to establish a representative office shall be revoked by operation of law if the applicant foreign (other nation) credit union does not establish and maintain the office within one year after the date of the approval, unless prior to the expiration of the one-year period the commissioner extends the time within which the foreign (other nation) credit union may establish the representative office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 612, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Branch Offices and Agencies [16550. - 16555.]

16550.

(a) No foreign (other nation) credit union shall transact business in this state except at a branch office or agency that it is licensed to maintain and at which it is permitted by this chapter to transact the business transacted.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not be deemed to prohibit any of the following:

(1) Any foreign (other nation) credit union from carrying on the activities described in subdivision (d) of
 Section 191 of the Corporations Code.

(2) The advertising or solicitation of shares or deposits in this state by a foreign (other nation) credit union made through the media of the mail, radio, television, magazines, newspapers, the Internet, or similar media, provided that shares or deposits are not accepted or received in this state.

(3) The acceptance of loan applications through agents in this state, provided the loan applications are approved or rejected, and the loans are funded, outside of this state.

(c) For the purposes of subdivision (a), no foreign (other nation) credit union shall be deemed to be transacting business in this state merely because a majority-owned subsidiary transacts business in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 612, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

16551.

No foreign (other nation) credit union shall be licensed to maintain a branch office or agency unless it is qualified to transact intrastate business in this state under Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 2100) of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code, except as provided in Section 8910 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 612, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

16552.

(a) No foreign (other nation) credit union shall establish or maintain a branch office or agency unless the commissioner shall have first approved its establishment and issued a license authorizing the foreign (other nation) credit union to maintain the branch office or agency.

(b) If the commissioner finds all of the following with respect to an application by a foreign (other nation) credit union for approval to establish a branch office or agency, the commissioner shall
 approve the application:

(1) That the foreign (other nation) credit union, the directors and officers of the foreign (other nation) credit union, and the proposed management of the office are each of good character and sound financial standing.

(2) That the financial history and condition of the foreign (other nation) credit union are satisfactory.

(3) That the management of the foreign (other nation) credit union and the proposed management of the office are adequate.

(4) That it is reasonable to believe that, if licensed to maintain the office, the foreign (other nation) credit union will operate the office in a safe and sound manner and in compliance with all applicable laws, regulations, and orders.

(5) That the foreign (other nation) credit union’s plan to establish and to maintain the office affords reasonable promise of successful operation.

(6) That the foreign (other nation) credit union’s establishment and maintenance of the office will promote the public convenience and advantage, and is necessary or convenient to meet the needs of the foreign (other nation) credit union’s members.

(7) Not more than 50 percent of the members of the foreign (other nation) credit union are or will be residents of this state.

If the commissioner finds otherwise, the commissioner shall deny the application.

(c) Whenever an application by a foreign (other nation) credit union for approval to establish a branch office or agency
 has been approved and all conditions precedent to the issuance of a license authorizing the foreign (other nation) credit union to maintain the branch office or agency have been fulfilled, the commissioner shall issue the license.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 612, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

16553.

The approval of an application for approval to establish a branch office or agency shall be revoked by operation of law if the applicant foreign (other nation) credit union does not establish and maintain the office within one year after the date of the approval, unless prior to the expiration of the one-year period the commissioner extends the time within which the foreign (other nation) credit union may establish the branch office or agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 612, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

16554.

(a) No foreign (other nation) credit union which is licensed to maintain a branch office or agency shall relocate the office unless the commissioner shall have first approved the relocation and issued a license authorizing the foreign (other nation) credit union to maintain the office at the new site.

(b) (1) In case the new site of the office is in the same vicinity as the old site, the commissioner shall approve an application by a foreign (other nation)
 credit union for approval to relocate a branch office or agency if the commissioner finds all of the following:

(A) That it will not be unsafe or unsound for the foreign (other nation) credit union to relocate the office.

(B) That the relocation of the office will not be substantially detrimental to the public convenience and advantage, or that the relocation is necessary in the interests of the safety and soundness of the foreign (other nation) credit union.

(2) In case the new site of the office is not in the same vicinity as the old site, the commissioner shall approve an application by a foreign (other nation) credit union for approval to relocate a branch office or agency if the commissioner finds all of the following:

(A) That the foreign (other
 nation) credit union’s plan to relocate the office and to maintain the office at the new site affords reasonable promise of successful operation.

(B) That the relocation of the office from the old site will not be substantially detrimental to the public convenience and advantage in the area which is primarily served by the office at the old site, or that the relocation is necessary in the interests of the safety and soundness of the foreign (other nation) credit union.

(C) That the relocation of the office to the new site will promote the public convenience and advantage.

If the commissioner finds otherwise, the commissioner shall deny the application.

(c) Whenever an application by a foreign (other nation) credit union for approval to relocate a branch office or agency has
 been approved and all conditions precedent to the issuance of a license authorizing the foreign (other nation) credit union to maintain the office at the new site have been fulfilled, the commissioner shall issue the license.

(d) Promptly after a foreign (other nation) credit union that is licensed to maintain a branch office or agency relocates the office, the foreign (other nation) credit union shall surrender to the commissioner the license which authorized it to maintain the office at the old site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 612, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

16555.

(a) (1) No foreign (other nation) credit union that is licensed to maintain a branch office or agency shall close the office unless the commissioner shall have first approved the closing.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall not be deemed to prohibit a foreign (other nation) credit union that is licensed to maintain a branch office or agency from closing an office in accordance with Article 8 (commencing with Section 16800).

(b) If the commissioner finds the following with respect to an application by a foreign (other nation) credit union for approval to close a branch office or agency, the commissioner shall approve the application:

(1) That it will not be unsafe or unsound for the foreign (other nation) credit union to close the office.

(2) That the closing of the office will not be substantially detrimental to the public convenience and advantage or that the closing of the office is necessary in the interests of the safety and soundness of the foreign (other nation) credit union.

If the commissioner finds otherwise, the commissioner shall deny the application.

(c) Whenever an application by a foreign (other nation) credit union for
 approval to close a branch office or agency has been approved and all conditions precedent to the closing have been fulfilled, the foreign (other nation) credit union may close the office and shall promptly thereafter surrender to the commissioner the license which authorized it to maintain the office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 612, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Conduct of Credit Union Business [16600. - 16607.]

16600.

(a) A foreign (other nation) credit union that has a license to establish and maintain an office may engage in activities at the office as may be authorized under applicable laws of its home country and the laws of this state.

(b) Nothing in subdivision (a) authorizes a foreign (other nation) credit union to engage in any activity at an office that it is not authorized to engage in or is prohibited from engaging in under the law of its home country, or that credit unions
 organized under the laws of this state are not authorized to engage in or are prohibited from engaging in under the laws of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 612, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

16601.

(a) A foreign (other nation) credit union may not expand its field of membership in this state without first obtaining the commissioner’s approval.

(b) An application for the commissioner’s approval of an expansion of the field of membership in this state by a foreign (other nation) credit union shall be in the form and contain the information as may be specified, by order or regulation, by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 612, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

16602.

(a) The following provisions of this code apply to a foreign (other nation) credit union that maintains a branch office or agency with respect to its business in this state as if the foreign (other nation) credit union were a credit union organized under the laws of this state:

(1) Section 14203.

(2) Section 14204.

(3) Section 14208.

(4) Section 14210.

(5) Section 14256.

(6) Section 14409.

(7) Section 14409.2.

(8) Section 14602.

(9) Section 14652.5.

(10) Section 14655, to the extent promissory notes of the type described in this section are carried on the books of a branch office of a foreign (other nation) credit union.

(11) Section 14656, to the extent promissory notes of the type described in this section are carried on the books of a branch office of a foreign (other nation) credit union.

(12) Article 8 (commencing with Section 14750) of Chapter 4.

(13) Section 14800.

(14) Section 14802.

(15) Section 14803.

(16) Section 14807.

(17) Section 14808.

(18) Section 14809.

(19) Article 1 (commencing with Section 14850) of Chapter 6.

(20) Article 1 (commencing with Section 14950) of Chapter 7.

(21) Article 2 (commencing with Section 15001) of Chapter 7.

(22) Article 3 (commencing with Section 15050) of Chapter 7, to the extent loans of the type described in that article are carried on the books of a branch office of a foreign (other nation) credit union.

(23) Section 15102.

(b) In addition to the laws specified in subdivision (a), the laws of this state applicable to transactions between a credit union organized under the laws of this state and its members and creditors shall similarly apply to the transactions of a foreign (other nation) credit union in this state. These laws include, but are not limited to, consumer protection laws and laws relating to creditor rights and remedies, commercial transactions, mortgages and deeds of trust, bank deposits and collections, and negotiable instruments.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 612, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

16603.

(a) Any foreign (other nation) credit union that is authorized to and does maintain a branch office or agency is exempted from the restrictions of Section 1 of Article XV of the California Constitution relating to rates of interest upon the loan or forbearance of any money, goods, or things in action or on accounts after demand.

(b) This section does not exempt a foreign (other nation) credit union or any subsidiary from complying with all other laws and regulations governing
 the business in which the foreign (other nation) credit union or subsidiary is engaged.

(c) This section creates and authorizes an exempt class of persons pursuant to Section 1 of Article XV of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 612, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

16604.

(a) A foreign (other nation) credit union which is licensed to establish and maintain an office or offices shall keep the assets of the offices separate and apart from the assets of its business outside this state.

(b) Persons who are creditors of a foreign (other nation) credit union as a result of the business of an office of the foreign (other nation) credit union in this state shall be entitled to priority over other creditors with respect to the assets of the business in
 this state of the foreign (other nation) credit union.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 612, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

16605.

(a) In this section:

(1) “Adjusted liabilities,” when used with respect to a foreign (other nation) credit union, means the liabilities of the foreign (other nation) credit union’s business in this state, determined in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, but excluding (A) accrued expenses, (B) any liability to an office (whether in or outside of this state) or majority-owned subsidiary of the foreign (other nation) credit union, and (C) other liabilities
 as the commissioner may by regulation or order exclude.

(2) “Applicable minimum,” when used with respect to eligible assets deposited or to be deposited with an approved depository by a foreign (other nation) credit union, means the amount as the commissioner may from time to time by regulation or order determine to be necessary for the maintenance of sound financial condition, for the protection of the interests of creditors of the foreign (other nation) credit union’s business in this state, or for the protection of the public interest. However, in the case of a foreign (other nation) credit union which is licensed to maintain a branch office, the applicable minimum shall not be less than 5 percent of the adjusted liabilities of the foreign (other nation) credit union.

(3) “Approved depository,” when used with respect to a foreign (other nation) credit union, means a bank or
 credit union organized under the laws of this state or a national bank headquartered in this state that has been selected by the foreign (other nation) credit union and approved by the commissioner for the purpose of acting as the approved depository of the foreign (other nation) credit union and that has filed with the commissioner, in the form as the commissioner may by regulation or order prescribe, an agreement to comply with all applicable provisions of this section and of any regulation or order issued under this section.

(4) “Eligible assets” when used with respect to a foreign (other nation) credit union, means any of the following:

(A) Cash.

(B) Any negotiable certificate of deposit that (i) has a maturity of not more than one year, (ii) is payable in the United States, and (iii) is issued by a bank
 organized under the laws of a state of the United States, by a national bank, or by a branch office of a foreign (other nation) bank that is located in the United States.

(C) Any banker’s acceptance that is payable in the United States and that is eligible for discount with a federal reserve bank.

(D) Any other asset that the commissioner by regulation or order determines to be eligible.

Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this paragraph, “eligible asset,” when used with respect to a foreign (other nation) credit union, does not include any instrument the issuer of which (i) is, or is affiliated with, the foreign (other nation) credit union, (ii) is domiciled in, or controlled by a person domiciled in, the same foreign nation as the foreign (other nation) credit union, or (iii) is, or is controlled by, the foreign nation. For
 purposes of the foregoing provision, to be “affiliated” means to control, to be controlled by, or to be under common control with; and to “control” has the meaning set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 700.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) The amount of adjusted liabilities of a foreign (other nation) credit union’s business in this state shall be computed for the period of time and in the manner as the commissioner may by regulation or order prescribe.

(2) An eligible asset shall be valued at the lesser of market or par.

(c) (1) Before a foreign (other nation) credit union is authorized to transact business in this state, the foreign (other nation) credit union shall deposit, and each foreign (other nation) credit union
 that is licensed to transact business in this state shall maintain on deposit, with an approved depository eligible assets having a value in an amount not less than the applicable minimum.

(2) Whenever a foreign (other nation) credit union that is licensed to transact business in this state ceases to be so licensed, the foreign (other nation) credit union shall thereafter maintain on deposit with an approved depository eligible assets having a value in an amount not less than the applicable minimum for the period of time as the commissioner may determine to be necessary for the protection of creditors of the foreign (other nation) credit union’s business in this state or for the protection of the public interest.

(d) (1) No foreign (other nation) credit union that maintains eligible assets on deposit with an approved depository pursuant to this section shall
 withdraw any eligible asset except with the prior approval of the commissioner.

(2) No approved depository that holds eligible assets on deposit from a foreign (other nation) credit union pursuant to this section shall release any eligible asset except with the prior approval of the commissioner or as otherwise provided in subdivision (h).

(e) Any foreign (other nation) credit union that maintains eligible assets on deposit with an approved depository pursuant to this section shall, unless the commissioner shall have suspended or revoked its authorization to transact business in this state or taken possession of its property and business in this state, be entitled to receive any income paid on eligible assets.

(f) (1) Whenever a foreign (other nation) credit union deposits eligible assets with,
 or withdraws eligible assets from, an approved depository pursuant to this section, the foreign (other nation) credit union shall do so in accordance with the procedures and requirements as the commissioner may by regulation or order prescribe.

(2) Whenever an approved depository receives, holds, or releases eligible assets pursuant to this section, the approved depository shall do so in accordance with the procedures and requirements as the commissioner may by regulation or order prescribe and shall file with the commissioner reports as and when the commissioner may by regulation or order require.

(g) Whenever a foreign (other nation) credit union maintains eligible assets on deposit with an approved depository pursuant to this section:

(1) The eligible assets shall be deemed to be pledged to the commissioner for
 the benefit of the creditors of the foreign (other nation) credit union’s business in the state; and, notwithstanding any provision of the Uniform Commercial Code to the contrary, the commissioner, for the benefit of these creditors, shall be deemed to have a security interest in the eligible assets.

(2) The eligible assets shall be free from any lien, charge, right of setoff, credit, or preference in connection with any claim of the approved depository against the foreign (other nation) credit union.

(h) (1) In case the commissioner takes possession of the property and business of a foreign (other nation) credit union that maintains eligible assets on deposit with an approved depository pursuant to this section, the approved depository shall, upon order of the commissioner, release the eligible assets to the commissioner, as liquidator of the property and
 business of the foreign (other nation) credit union.

(2) In case a foreign (other nation) credit union that maintains eligible assets on deposit with an approved depository pursuant to this section fails to pay any judgment creditor of its business in this state and the commissioner has not taken possession of the property and business of the foreign (other nation) credit union, the approved depository shall release the eligible assets to the commissioner, and the commissioner shall dispose of the eligible assets, as a court of competent jurisdiction of this state or of the United States may order for the benefit of the judgment creditor. For purposes of this paragraph, “judgment creditor of its business in this state” means a person to whom the foreign (other nation) credit union is required to pay money under a judgment that (A) arose out of the foreign (other nation) credit union’s business in this state, (B) has been entered by a court of
 this state or of the United States, (C) has become final, in that all possibility of direct attack on the judgment by way of appeal, motion for new trial, motion to vacate, or petition for extraordinary writ has been exhausted, and (D) has remained unpaid for a period of not less than 60 days after becoming final.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 612, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

16607.

(a) In this section:

(1) “Adjusted liabilities,” when used with respect to a foreign (other nation) credit union that is licensed to maintain a branch office, means the liabilities of the foreign (other nation) credit union’s business in this state, excluding (A) accrued expenses, (B) any liability to an office (whether in or outside of this state) or majority-owned subsidiary of the foreign (other nation) credit union, and (C) other liabilities as the commissioner may by
 regulation or order exclude.

(2) “Eligible assets” means any asset which the commissioner by regulation or order determines to be eligible for purposes of this section. However, “eligible asset,” when used with respect to a foreign (other nation) credit union that is licensed to maintain a branch office, includes any asset which the foreign (other nation) credit union maintains on deposit pursuant to Section 16606.

(b) For purposes of this section, the amount of eligible assets and the amount of adjusted liabilities of a foreign (other nation) credit union that is licensed to maintain a branch office each be computed for the period of time and in the manner as the commissioner may by regulation or order prescribe.

(c) A foreign (other nation) credit union licensed to maintain a branch office shall hold at its branch
 offices in this state or at any other place as the commissioner may approve, eligible assets in the amount, if any, as the commissioner may from time to time by regulation or order determine to be necessary for the maintenance of sound financial condition, for the protection of the interests of creditors of the foreign (other nation) credit union’s business in this state, or for the protection of the public interest. However, in no event shall the amount exceed 108 percent of the adjusted liabilities of the foreign (other nation) credit union’s business in this state.

(d) If the commissioner finds, with respect to a foreign (other nation) credit union licensed to maintain a branch office in this state, that the action is necessary for the maintenance of sound financial condition, for the protection of the interests of creditors of the foreign (other nation) credit union’s business in this state, or for the protection of the public interest, the
 commissioner may order the foreign (other nation) credit union to place all or part of the eligible assets which the foreign (other nation) credit union is required to hold under subdivision (c) in the custody of a bank organized under the laws of this state or a national bank headquartered in this state as the commissioner may designate, and such assets shall be subject to the order of the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 612, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Examination, Reports, and Records [16700. - 16704.]

16700.

(a) The commissioner may at any time investigate into the affairs and examine the books, accounts, and other records of a foreign (other nation) credit union and of any subsidiary thereof.

(b) The commissioner and any person designated by the commissioner shall have free access to any office of the foreign (other nation) credit union and to its books, accounts, and other records.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 612, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

16701.

The commissioner may make an examination of a foreign (other nation) credit union at any office of the commissioner. The commissioner may make an examination of any office, within or outside of this state, of a foreign (other nation) credit union that maintains an office in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 404, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

16702.

(a) Each foreign (other nation) credit union shall, within 10 days after receipt or within any extended time that the commissioner may specify, file with the commissioner a copy of any audit report obtained by, and of any examination report prepared for, the foreign (other nation) credit union.

(b) Each foreign (other nation) credit union shall file with the commissioner a copy of any response made by the foreign (other nation) credit union to an audit or examination report
 referred to in subdivision (a) within 10 days after making the response or within any extended time that the commissioner may specify.
